Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 11A Executive Branch Code of Ethics
11A.055.
Raising of funds for certain activities permitted — Exemption from requirements of chapter for nonprofit charitable organization.

Any provision of KRS Chapter 11A to the contrary notwithstanding, a state agency or a public servant may raise funds, either individually or as a department or agency, for a charitable nonprofit organization granted a tax exemption by the Internal Revenue Service under Section 501c of the Internal Revenue Code without violating the provisions of this chapter. Raising of funds shall include but not be limited to holding events for the benefit of the charitable organization, contacting potential donors, providing prizes, and engaging in other forms of fundraising and providing the funds thus raised to the charitable organization.

Any provision of KRS Chapter 11A to the contrary notwithstanding, a state agency or a public servant may raise funds, either individually or as a department or agency, for crime prevention, drug and alcohol abuse prevention, tourism promotion, and traffic safety programs without violating the provisions of this chapter. Raising of funds shall include but not be limited to holding events for the benefit of a program specified in this section, contacting potential donors, providing prizes, and engaging in other forms of fundraising and providing the funds thus raised to the program.

Any provision of KRS Chapter 11A to the contrary notwithstanding, any nonprofit charitable organization organized under 26

U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(3)

, affiliated with the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, or whose purpose is the promotion of tourism in the Commonwealth:

Shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter;

May benefit from cabinet employees working on its behalf without the employees violating the provisions of this chapter; and

May make contributions to the cabinet after being solicited by cabinet employees without the employees violating the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 290, § 2, effective April 9, 2002; 2017 ch. 175, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

11A.060.
Executive Branch Ethics Commission — Membership — Officers — Compensation — Removal — Meetings.

The Executive Branch Ethics Commission is hereby established.

The commission shall be composed of seven (7) members, two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor. Each of the following shall appoint one (1) member of the commission:

Treasurer;

Auditor of Public Accounts;

Commissioner of Agriculture;

Secretary of State; and

Attorney General.

On July 14, 2022, the terms of the existing members of the commission shall terminate and seven (7) new initial members shall be appointed by the officials listed under subsection (2) of this section. Members of the commission shall serve staggered terms of four (4) years. Of the initial members appointed as provided in this section, one (1) member shall serve a term of one (1) year and shall be appointed by the Treasurer, one (1) member shall serve a term of two (2) years and shall be appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts, two (2) members shall serve a term of three (3) years, one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor and one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture, and three (3) members shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years, one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor, one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Secretary of State, and one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Attorney General. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for staggered terms of four (4) years.

The commission shall every two (2) years elect from its membership a chair and vice chair. In the absence of the chair or in the event of a vacancy in that position, the vice chair shall serve as chair.

A member of the commission shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for attending meetings and shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of duties.

All members shall be registered voters of the state.

Members of the commission shall be removed by the appointing authority who appointed him or her for cause only, including substantial neglect of duty and inability to discharge the powers and duties of office.

A quorum shall consist of four (4) or more members. An affirmative vote of four (4) or more members shall be necessary for commission action.

The commission shall meet at the call of the chair or a majority of its members.

The commission shall be attached to the Finance and Administration Cabinet for administrative purposes only.

The commission shall not be reorganized except by statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 208, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 602, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 12, § 17, effective June 25, 2009; 2022 ch. 203, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

11A.070.
Executive director and employees of commission — Use of services and facilities of state agencies.

The commission may employ an executive director and any other employees, agents, and consultants it considers necessary, and may prescribe their duties, fix their compensation, and provide for reimbursement of their expenses within the amount available therefor by appropriation. The commission may also engage outside professional counsel it considers necessary. The commission and its staff may also make use of the services and facilities of the office of the Attorney General or of any other state agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 9, effective July 14, 1992.

11A.080.
Investigation of complaints — Procedures — Findings — Resolution.

Upon a complaint signed under penalty of perjury by any person, or upon its own motion, the commission shall conduct a preliminary investigation of any alleged violation of this chapter.

The preliminary investigation shall begin not later than ten (10) days after the next commission meeting following the receipt of the sworn complaint, or, if the investigation is initiated by the commission’s own motion, not later than ten (10) days after the date of the adoption of the motion.

Within ten (10) days of the commencement of the preliminary investigation, the commission shall forward a copy of the complaint, if one has been filed, or a statement of possible violations being investigated, and a general statement of the applicable law to the person alleged to have committed a violation.

For each complaint filed by a person other than the commission or a member of the commission, the commission shall make a finding as to whether the complaint is:

Well-grounded in fact;

Warranted by existing law; and

Filed for a good-faith argument or reason and not for any improper purpose, such as for political advantage, to harass or embarrass a person or persons, to cause delays, or to increase the costs of adjudicating a case before the commission.

All commission proceedings and records relating to a preliminary investigation shall be confidential until a final determination is made by the commission, except:

The commission may turn over to the Attorney General, the United States Attorney, or the Commonwealth’s attorney of the jurisdiction in which the offense allegedly occurred, evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings or, at its discretion, may at any time turn over to the Personnel Board, the Auditor of Public Accounts, or any other agency with jurisdiction to review, audit, or investigate the alleged offense, evidence which may be used by those agencies for investigative purposes;

If the alleged violator publicly discloses the existence of a preliminary investigation, the commission may publicly confirm the existence of the inquiry and, in its discretion, make public any documents which were issued to either party;

If the matter being investigated was referred to the commission from another state agency, the commission may inform the referring state agency of the status of any preliminary investigation and of any action taken on the matter.

If the commission determines in the preliminary investigation that the facts are not sufficient to constitute a violation of this chapter, the commission shall immediately terminate the investigation and notify in writing the complainant, if any, and the person alleged to have committed a violation. The commission may confidentially inform the alleged violator of potential violations and provide information to ensure future compliance with the law. If the alleged violator publicly discloses the existence of such action by the commission, the commission may confirm the existence of the resolution and, in its discretion, make public any documents which were issued to the alleged violator.

If the commission, during the course of the preliminary investigation, finds probable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter has occurred, the commission may, upon majority vote:

Due to mitigating circumstances such as lack of significant economic advantage or gain by the alleged violator, lack of significant economic loss to the state, or lack of significant impact on public confidence in government, in writing, confidentially reprimand the alleged violator for potential violations of the law and provide a copy of the reprimand to the alleged violator’s appointing authority, if any. If the alleged violator publicly discloses the existence of such an action, the commission may confirm the existence of the action and, in its discretion, make public any documents which were issued to the alleged violator; or

Initiate an administrative proceeding to determine whether there has been a violation.

If the commission determines that a violation of this chapter has occurred in a case involving a contract with state government, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may void any contract related to that case.

If the commission determines that a violation of the provisions of KRS

11A.001

to

11A.130

has occurred, an employer of a former officer or public servant may be subject to a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 73, effective September 16, 1993; 1998, ch. 603, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 475, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2012, ch. 34, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 162, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 74, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 203, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

11A.090.
Subpoena power.

For the purpose of carrying out a preliminary investigation, the commission may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of documents, books, papers, or other records. Subpoenas may be issued by the chairman or the majority of the members of the commission and shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas for witnesses in civil cases. All provisions of law relative to subpoenas issued in such cases, including compensation of witnesses, shall apply to subpoenas issued by the commission. Upon petition by the commission, any Circuit Court within the jurisdiction of which any inquiry is being carried on may, in case of refusal to obey a subpoena or order of the commission, issue an order requiring compliance. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 14, effective July 15, 1996.

11A.100.
Procedures for administrative hearings — Action by commission.

The provisions of KRS Chapter 13B shall apply to all commission administrative hearings, except for the provisions of:

KRS 13B.030(2)(b);

KRS 13B.050(1), (2), and (3) when a party fails to file an answer or otherwise participate; and

KRS 13B.090(7).

All administrative hearings of the commission carried out pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be public, unless the members vote to go into executive session in accordance with KRS

61.810

.

The commission, upon a finding pursuant to an administrative hearing that there has been clear and convincing proof of a violation of this chapter, may:

Issue an order requiring the violator to cease and desist the violation; and

Issue an order requiring the violator to file any report, statement, or other information as required by this chapter; and

In writing, publicly reprimand the violator for potential violations of the law and provide a copy of the reprimand to the alleged violator’s appointing authority, if any; and

In writing, recommend to the violator’s appointing authority that the violator be removed or suspended from office or employment, and include a recommendation for length of suspension, to be approved by the appointing authority, if any; and

Issue an order requiring the violator to pay a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation of this chapter.

In addition to any other remedies provided by law, any violation of this chapter which has substantially influenced the action taken by any state agency in any particular matter shall be grounds for voiding, rescinding, or canceling the action on such terms as the interests of the state and innocent third persons require.

The commission shall refer to the Attorney General evidence of violations of KRS

11A.040

for prosecution. The Attorney General shall have responsibility for all prosecutions under the law and may request from the commission all evidence collected in its investigation. The commission may represent itself through the general counsel in all subsequent proceedings.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 12, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 15, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 603, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 475, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2018 ch. 188, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

11A.110.
Additional duties of commission.

The commission shall perform the following additional duties:

On its own initiative or upon a signed request in writing, issue and publish advisory opinions on the requirements of this chapter for those who wish to use the opinion to guide their own conduct. If requested in writing by the person seeking the advisory opinion, the commission shall not release that person’s name;

Provide a continuing program of education, assistance, and information to public servants, including, but not limited to, publishing and making available to the persons subject to this chapter and the public explanatory information concerning this chapter, the duties imposed by it, and the means of enforcement;

Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this chapter, including, if required by the commission, electronic filing of disclosure statements by executive agency lobbyists, their employers, or real parties in interest;

Prescribe forms for statements required by this chapter and furnish the forms to persons required to file the statements. The forms shall be adopted as administrative regulations or adopted by reference in an administrative regulation;

Prepare and publish a manual of guidelines setting forth uniform methods of reporting for use by persons required to file under this chapter;

Accept and file any information voluntarily supplied that exceeds the requirements of this chapter;

Preserve the disclosure statements filed with it for four (4) years from the date of receipt;

Make statements and reports filed with the commission available for public inspection and copying pursuant to KRS

61.870

to KRS

61.884

(Kentucky Open Records Law);

Compile and maintain a current index of all statements filed with the commission to facilitate public access to the reports and statements;

Prepare and publish reports as it may deem appropriate;

Audit statements and reports filed with the commission;

Make recommendations for legislation relating to governmental ethics and other matters included in this chapter as the commission deems desirable; and

Prepare a biennial written report, no later than December 1 of each odd-numbered year, to the Legislative Research Commission, the Governor, and the public on the activities of the commission in the preceding two (2) fiscal years. The report shall contain the names and duties of each individual employed by the commission and a summary of commission determinations and advisory opinions. The commission shall prevent disclosure of the identity of a person involved in decisions or advisory opinions. The report may contain other information on matters within the commission’s jurisdiction and recommendations for legislation as the commission deems desirable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 13, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 429, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2019 ch. 74, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

11A.120.
Employment of public servant by state institution of higher education.

Nothing in KRS

11A.001

to

11A.110

shall prohibit or restrict a public servant from accepting outside employment in a state institution of higher education as long as that outside employment does not interfere or conflict with the public servant’s state employment duties. Nothing in this section shall prohibit or restrict a present or former public servant from accepting employment with a state institution of higher education immediately following termination of his office or employment in another state agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 14, effective July 14, 1992.

11A.130.
Employment of officer or public servant in privatized agency by agency’s operator.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit an officer or public servant employed by an agency that is privatized from accepting employment from the person or business which is operating that agency if the officer or public servant was not involved in making the decision to privatize or in developing the provisions of the privatization contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 434, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 492, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.